Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.36.040

Impairment to be corrected before retirement of notes or debentures.

Before such capital notes or debentures are retired or paid by the bank or mutual savings bank, any existing impairment of its capital stock must be overcome or corrected to the satisfaction of the director.

[ 2014 c 37 s 207; 1994 c 92 s 78; 1955 c 33 s 30.36.040. Prior: 1935 c 42 s 4; RRS s 3295-4. Formerly RCW 30.36.040.]